District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-1521.11

Rules

Repealed.

May 26, 1970, 84 Stat. 266, Pub. L. 91-268, § 1-12
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-194, § 2, 34 DCR 479
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-157, § 2, 39 DCR 5686
May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-125, § 2, 43 DCR 1548
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 30(d), 55 DCR 2532

History

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1501 to 2-1511.
2001 Ed., § 7-1521.10a.
1973 Ed., § 2-271 to 2-277.

Prior Codifications

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 4 of D.C. Law 9-157 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.

Uniform Law: This subchapter was based upon §§ 1 to 9 of the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (1968 Act).

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-194, see Mayor’s Order 87-145, June 19, 1987.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 9-157, the “Tissue Transplantation Distribution Amendment Act of 1992”, see Mayor’s Order 93-61, May 12, 1993.

Delegation of Authority